ja: ウィングハンドルタイプ: フルブーム; ハイブリッド; リジッドハンドル; ソフトウェビングハンドル; その他
nb: Type vingehåndtak: Hel bom; Hybrid; Stive håndtak; Myke båndhåndtak; Annet
zh-CN: 风翼把手类型: 全横杆; 混合式; 硬质把手; 软织带把手; 其他
zh-TW: 風翼把手類型: 全硬把手 (Full boom); 混合式; 剛性把手; 軟織帶把手; 其他
it: Tipo di maniglia dell'ala: Boma intero; Ibrida; Maniglie rigide; Maniglie in fettuccia morbida; Altro
ru: Тип ручки крыла: Цельный гик; Гибридные; Жесткие ручки; Мягкие тканевые ручки; Другое
lt-LT: Sparnų rankenos tipas: Pilnas gikas; Hibridinė; Kietos rankenos; Minkštos austinės rankenos; Kita
fr: Type à poignée papillon: Wishbone intégral; Hybride; Poignées rigides; Poignées souples en sangle; Autre
fi: Siipien kahvatyyppi: Täyspuomi; Hybridi; Jäykät kahvat; Pehmeät hihnakahvat; Muu
es: Tipo de asa para wingfoil: Botavara completa; Híbrido; Asas rígidas; Asas de cincha suaves; Otro
bg-BG: Тип дръжка на крилото: Пълен гик; Хибрид; Твърди дръжки; Меки текстилни дръжки; Друго
hr-HR: Vrsta ručke krila: Puni bum; Hibridna; Krute ručke; Meke pletene ručke; Ostalo
sv: Typ av vinghandtag: Full bom; Hybrid; Fasta handtag; Mjuka vävbandshandtag; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ rukoväte krídla: Plné rahno; Hybridné; Pevné rukoväti; Mäkké popruhové rukoväti; Iné
ro-RO: Tip de mâner pentru aripă: Ghiu complet; Hibrid; Mânere rigide; Mânere moi din chingi; Altele
tr: Kanat tutamak tipi: Tam bumba; Hibrit; Sert tutacaklar; Yumuşak şerit tutacaklar; Diğer
ko: 윙 핸들 유형: 풀 붐; 하이브리드; 리지드 핸들; 소프트 웨빙 핸들; 기타
vi: Loại tay cầm trên cánh: Trục vòm nguyên khối; Kết hợp; Tay cầm cứng; Tay cầm dây mềm; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de pega da asa: Retranca completa; Híbrido; Pegas rígidas; Pegas de fita macia; Outro
de: Wing-Handle-Art: Full Boom; Hybrid; Starre Griffe; Weiche Gurtbandgriffe; Sonstige
en: Wing handle type: Full boom; Hybrid; Rigid handles; Soft webbing handles; Other
nl: Type handgreep vleugel: Volledige giek; Hybride; Harde handgrepen; Zachte geweven handgrepen; Overige
th: ประเภทด้ามจับปีก: แฮนเดิลแบบบูมเต็ม; ไฮบริด; แฮนเดิลแบบแข็ง; แฮนเดิลแบบสายรัดอ่อนนุ่ม; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de alça da aba: Retranca inteira; Híbrido; Alças rígidas; Alças de fita macia; Outro
cs: Typ křídlové rukojeti: Plné ráhno; Hybridní; Pevná madla; Měkká popruhová madla; Jiné
hu: Szárnyfogantyú típusa: Teljes boom; Hibrid; Merev fogantyúk; Puha hevederes fogantyúk; Egyéb
da: Håndtagstype for vinge: Fuld bom; Hybrid; Stive håndtag; Bløde håndtag i gjord; Andet
el: Τύπος λαβής πτερυγίου: Πλήρης μάτσα; Υβριδική; Άκαμπτες λαβές; Μαλακές υφασμάτινες λαβές; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta krilnega ročaja: Celoten lok (boom); Hibridno; Trdi ročaji; Mehki ročaji iz traku; Drugo
pl: Typ uchwytu skrzydła: Pełny bom; Hybrydowy; Sztywne uchwyty; Miękkie uchwyty z taśmy; Inny